Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STATE PARKS AND TRAILS.new text end new text begin $25,802,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $26,920,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the parks and trails fund to the commissioner of natural resources for state parks, recreation areas, and trails to: new text end new text begin (1) connect people to the outdoors; new text end new text begin (2) acquire land and create opportunities; new text end new text begin (3) maintain existing holdings; and new text end new text begin (4) improve cooperation by coordinating with partners to implement the 25-year long-range parks and trails legacy plan. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; REGIONAL PARKS AND TRAILS.new text end new text begin (a) $12,901,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $13,460,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the parks and trails fund to the commissioner of natural resources for grants for parks and trails of regional significance outside the seven-county metropolitan area under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.535. The grants awarded under this paragraph must be based on the lists of recommended projects submitted to the legislative committees under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.536, subdivision 10, from the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission established under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.536. Grants funded under this paragraph must support parks and trails of regional or statewide significance that meet the applicable definitions and criteria for regional parks and trails contained in the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Strategic Plan adopted by the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission on April 22, 2015. Grant recipients identified under this paragraph must submit a grant application to the commissioner of natural resources. Of the amount appropriated, up to $140,000 each year may be used by the commissioner for the actual cost of issuing and monitoring the grants for the commission. Of the amount appropriated, $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission to carry out its duties under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.536, including the continued development of a statewide system plan for regional parks and trails outside the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2026, the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission must submit a list of projects that contains the commission's recommendations for funding from the parks and trails fund for fiscal year 2027 to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and the parks and trails fund. new text end new text begin (c) By January 15, 2026, the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission must submit a report that contains the commission's criteria for funding from the parks and trails fund, including the criteria used to determine if a park or trail is of regional significance, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and the parks and trails fund. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COORDINATION.new text end new text begin $652,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $679,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the parks and trails fund to the commissioner of natural resources for coordination and projects between the department, the Metropolitan Council, and the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission; enhanced web-based information for park and trail users; and support of activities of the Parks and Trails Legacy Advisory Committee. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin PARKS AND TRAILS FUND APPROPRIATION EXTENSIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Cannon Valley Trail; Goodhue County. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Goodhue County for the Cannon Valley Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Beaver Island Trail; Stearns County. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to Stearns County for the Beaver Island Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bluffs Traverse Trail; city of Winona. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Winona for the Bluffs Traverse Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Jay C. Hormel Nature Center; city of Austin. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Austin for the Jay C. Hormel Nature Center project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Spirit Mountain Recreation Area; city of Duluth. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Duluth for the Spirit Mountain Recreation Area project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2023 appropriation under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 3, paragraph (b), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Waabizheshikana/Marten Trail; city of Duluth. new text end new text begin The availability of the grant to the city of Duluth for the Waabizheshikana/Marten Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end